Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 31 Quo Warranto

Cross references. —

As to actions by and against the state generally, see chapter 35 of this title.

As to jurisdiction, see art. 5, § 3, Wyo. Const.

As to application for writ, see Rule 3, Sup. Ct.

When applicable. —

When a civil action is brought in this state against one usurping, unlawfully holding or exercising public office, the quo warranto statutes are applicable. Dickerson v. City Council of Buffalo, 582 P.2d 80,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 221

(Wyo. 1978).

Action brought in name of state. —

The statutes of this state provide that in those instances where the legal existence of a corporation and the right of public officers to hold office are at issue, the remedy is quo warranto, and the action must be brought under the pertinent statutes in the name of the state of Wyoming. Dickerson v. City Council, 582 P.2d 80,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 221

(Wyo. 1978).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

65 Am. Jur. 2d Quo Warranto § 1 et seq.

Statute of limitations or laches as applicable to quo warranto proceedings, 26 ALR2d 828.

Quo warranto as remedy for determination of rights of noncivil service or public employee, with respect to discharge, under state veterans' tenure statute, 58 ALR2d 960.

Remedy for determining right or title to office in unincorporated private association, 82 ALR2d 1169.

Default judgment against defendant without introduction of evidence in quo warranto proceedings, 92 ALR2d 1121.

74 C.J.S. Quo Warranto § 1 et seq.

§ 1-31-101.
Actions against persons.

A civil action may be brought in the name of the state:

Against a person who usurps, intrudes into or unlawfully holds or exercises a public office, civil or military, or a franchise within this state or an office in a corporation created by authority of this state;

Against a public officer, civil or military, who does or suffers an act which by law works a forfeiture of his office;

Against an association of persons who act as a corporation within this state without being legally incorporated or who fail to comply with the corporation laws of the state.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 744; R.S. 1887, § 3092; R.S. 1899, § 4213; C.S. 1910, § 5073; C.S. 1920, § 6335; R.S. 1931, § 89-4601; C.S. 1945, § 3-7101; W.S. 1957, § 1-896; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-32-101

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Section furnishes exclusive remedy in action to try title to public office,

being both appropriate and adequate. State ex rel. Pearson v. Hansen, 401 P.2d 954,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 1965).

Exclusive and adequate remedy. —

Where quo warranto is available to try title to public office, the remedy is appropriate, adequate and exclusive. Dickerson v. City Council of Buffalo, 582 P.2d 80,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 221

(Wyo. 1978).

Injunction not permissible where quo warranto is appropriate.
—

It is elementary that in situations wherein a quo warranto proceeding is an appropriate and adequate remedy resort to an injunction is not permissible. Crawford v. City of Sheridan, 392 P.2d 519,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 1964).

Cited

in

In re Fourth Judicial Dist., 4 Wyo. 133, 32 P. 850,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(1893); Reals v. Smith, 8 Wyo. 159, 56 P. 690,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(1899).

§ 1-31-102.
Actions against corporations.

A like action may be brought against a corporation:

When it has violated the law governing its creation or renewal;

When it has forfeited its privileges and franchises by nonuse;

When it has committed or omitted an act which amounts to a surrender of its corporate rights, privileges and franchises;

When it has misused a franchise or privilege conferred upon it by law or exercised a franchise or privilege not so conferred.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 745; R.S. 1887, § 3093; R.S. 1899, § 4214; C.S. 1910, § 5074; C.S. 1920, § 6336; R.S. 1931, § 89-4602; C.S. 1945, § 3-7102; W.S. 1957, § 1-897; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-32-102

.

Cross references. —

As to judgments in actions against corporations, see §§

1-31-118

to

1-31-122

.

As to limitation upon time of bringing action against corporations or officers, see §

1-31-127

.

For general provisions concerning corporations, see §§

17-16-101

to 17-16-1803.

As to quo warranto proceedings to forfeit the charter of corporations guilty of unfair discrimination, see §

40-4-102

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Quoted

in

Dickerson v. City Council, 582 P.2d 80,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 221

(Wyo. 1978).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Personal Liability for Directors of Nonprofit Corporations in Wyoming,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 273 (1983).

§ 1-31-103.
Commencement of action.

The attorney general
or a county attorney shall commence an action when directed by the
governor, supreme court or legislature, or when upon complaint or
otherwise he has good reason to believe that such an action can be
established by proof.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 746; R.S. 1887, § 3094; R.S. 1899, § 4215; C.S. 1910, § 5075; C.S. 1920, § 6337; R.S. 1931, § 89-4603; C.S. 1945, § 3-7103; W.S. 1957, § 1-898; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-32-103

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1.

§ 1-31-104.
Upon whose relation action brought; security for costs.

The prosecuting officer may bring the action upon his own relation or, by leave of court, he may bring the action upon the relation of another person. If the action is brought pursuant to W.S. 1-31-101(a)(i), the court may require security for costs as in other cases.

Upon application for leave to file a petition upon the relation of another person, the court may direct notice thereof to be given to the defendant previous to granting such leave and may hear the defendant in opposition thereto; and if leave is granted an entry thereof shall be made on the journal or the fact shall be endorsed by the judge on the petition, which shall then be filed.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 747, 753; R.S. 1887, §§ 3095, 3101; R.S. 1899, §§ 4216, 4222; C.S. 1910, §§ 5076, 5082; C.S. 1920, §§ 6338, 6344; R.S. 1931, §§ 89-4604, 89-4610; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-7104, 3-7110; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-899, 1-905; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-32-104

.

Cross references. —

As to fees, costs and security therefor, see chapter 14 of this title.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Personal Liability for Directors of Nonprofit Corporations in Wyoming,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 273 (1983).

§ 1-31-105.
Action by person claiming public office; security for costs.

A person claiming to
be entitled to a public office unlawfully held and exercised by another
may bring an action therefor upon giving security for costs.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 748; R.S. 1887, § 3096; R.S. 1899, § 4217; C.S. 1910, § 5077; C.S. 1920, § 6339; R.S. 1931, § 89-4605; C.S. 1945, § 3-7105; W.S. 1957, § 1-900; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-32-105

.

Cross references. —

As to fees, costs and security therefor, see chapter 14 of this title.

Quo warranto proper remedy. —

Quo warranto and not mandamus is the proper remedy to try title to office between contending parties. State ex rel. Hamilton v. Grant, 14 Wyo. 41, 81 P. 795,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 14 Wyo. 41, 81 P. 795,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1905).

Ex rel. action. —

Under provisions of this section and former section, the action should be prosecuted in the name of the state on relation of the claimant. Reals v. Smith, 8 Wyo. 159, 56 P. 690,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1899).

Proof of right to office. —

In quo warranto to determine the right and title of the relator to office, his legal right to the office must affirmatively appear, but no presumption obtains in favor of respondent charged with obtaining possession of the office by force under an alleged appointment by the governor. People ex rel. Emerson v. Shawver, 30 Wyo. 366, 222 P. 11,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1924).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of private person not claiming office to maintain quo warranto proceeding to test title to, or existence of, public office, 51 ALR2d 1306.

§ 1-31-106.
Appointment of attorney when county attorney disabled.

When the office of county
attorney is vacant or when the county attorney is absent, interested
in the action or disabled from any cause, the court may direct or
permit any member of the bar to act in his place to bring and prosecute
the action.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 749; R.S. 1887, § 3097; R.S. 1899, § 4218; C.S. 1910, § 5078; C.S. 1920, § 6340; R.S. 1931, § 89-4606; C.S. 1945, § 3-7106; W.S. 1957, § 1-901; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-32-106

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1.

§ 1-31-107.
Petition in action for usurpation of office.

When the action is against
a person for usurping an office, the petition shall set forth the
name of the person who claims to be entitled thereto with an averment
of his right thereto.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 750; R.S. 1887, § 3098; R.S. 1899, § 4219; C.S. 1910, § 5079; C.S. 1920, § 6341; R.S. 1931, § 89-4607; C.S. 1945, § 3-7107; W.S. 1957, § 1-902; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-32-107

.

Election contest. —

Original application for leave to file petition in quo warranto to contest election of district judge was denied where petition charged irregular, illegal or fraudulent acts or omissions relating to conduct of election or canvassing of votes, and determination of fact issues would require taking large volume of evidence. State ex rel. Walton v. Christmas, 48 Wyo. 239, 44 P.2d 905,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1935).

§ 1-31-108.
All claimants may be made defendants.

All persons who claim
to be entitled to the same office or franchise may be made defendants
in the same action.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 751; R.S. 1887, § 3099; R.S. 1899, § 4220; C.S. 1910, § 5080; C.S. 1920, § 6342; R.S. 1931, § 89-4608; C.S. 1945, § 3-7108; W.S. 1957, § 1-903; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-32-108

.

§ 1-31-109.
Place of bringing action.

An action under W.S.

1-31-101

through

1-31-130

can be brought in the supreme court, or in the district
court of the county in which the defendant or one (1) of the defendants,
resides or is found or, when the defendant is a corporation, in the
county in which it is situated or has a place of business.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 752; R.S. 1887, § 3100; R.S. 1899, § 4221; C.S. 1910, § 5081; C.S. 1920, § 6343; R.S. 1931, § 89-4609; C.S. 1945, § 3-7109; W.S. 1957, § 1-904; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-32-109

.

Cross references. —

As to venue provisions generally, see chapter 5 of this title.

§ 1-31-110.
Issuance and service of summons.

When the petition is
filed a summons shall issue and be served as in other cases.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 754; R.S. 1887, § 3102; R.S. 1899, § 4223; C.S. 1910, § 5083; C.S. 1920, § 6345; R.S. 1931, § 89-4611; C.S. 1945, § 3-7111; W.S. 1957, § 1-906; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-32-110

.

Cross references. —

As to issuance and service of summons, see Rule 4, W.R.C.P.

§ 1-31-111.
Service by publication.

When a summons is returned
not served because the defendant or its officers or office cannot
be found within the county, service by publication may be had as provided
by the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 755; R.S. 1887, § 3103; R.S. 1899, § 4224; C.S. 1910, § 5084; C.S. 1920, § 6346; R.S. 1931, § 89-4612; C.S. 1945, § 3-7112; W.S. 1957, § 1-907; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-32-111

.

Cross references. —

For provisions as to service by publication, see Rule 4(e), W.R.C.P.

§ 1-31-112.
Judgment in case of usurpation.

When a defendant is found
guilty of usurping, intruding into or unlawfully holding or exercising
an office, franchise or privilege, judgment shall be rendered ousting
the defendant and allowing the relator to recover his costs.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 758; R.S. 1887, § 3106; R.S. 1899, § 4227; C.S. 1910, § 5087; C.S. 1920, § 6349; R.S. 1931, § 89-4615; C.S. 1945, § 3-7115; W.S. 1957, § 1-910; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-32-112

.

Acting adjutant general held usurper. —

The governor exceeded his powers in undertaking to remove plaintiff from the office of adjutant general of the Wyoming national guard under the general power conferred by the provisions of former section, and because of such fundamental error, the acting adjutant general was a usurper unlawfully holding and occupying such office. State ex rel. Pearson v. Hansen, 401 P.2d 954,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 1965).

§ 1-31-113.
Judgment ousting trustee or director of corporation.

When the action is against
a trustee or director of a corporation and the court finds that at
his election either illegal votes were received or legal votes were
rejected sufficient to change the result, judgment may be rendered
ousting the defendant and in favor of the person who is entitled to
be declared elected at the election.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 759; R.S. 1887, § 3107; R.S. 1899, § 4228; C.S. 1910, § 5088; C.S. 1920, § 6350; R.S. 1931, § 89-4616; C.S. 1945, § 3-7116; W.S. 1957, § 1-911; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-32-113

.

§ 1-31-114.
Judgment ousting trustee or director of corporation; order for new
election of trustee; service.

In a case named in W.S.

1-31-113

the court may order a new election to be held at a time
and place and by judges appointed by the court. Notice of the election,
naming the judges, shall be given for the time and in the manner provided
by law for notice of elections of directors or trustees of the corporation.
The order of the court is obligatory upon the corporation and its
officers when a duly certified copy thereof is served upon its secretary
personally or left at its principal office with someone of suitable
age, and the court may enforce its order by contempt or otherwise.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 760; R.S. 1887, § 3108; R.S. 1899, § 4229; C.S. 1910, § 5089; C.S. 1920, § 6351; R.S. 1931, § 89-4617; C.S. 1945, § 3-7117; W.S. 1957, § 1-912; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-32-114

.

§ 1-31-115.
Rights of persons adjudged entitled to office; generally; to take
oath and execute bond; taking over office; demanding books and papers.

If judgment is rendered
in favor of the person claiming to be entitled to an office, he may,
after taking the oath of office and executing any official bond required
by law, assume the execution of the office. He shall immediately demand
of the defendant all books and papers in his custody or within his
power pertaining to the office from which he has been ousted.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 761; R.S. 1887, § 3109; R.S. 1899, § 4230; C.S. 1910, § 5090; C.S. 1920, § 6352; R.S. 1931, § 89-4618; C.S. 1945, § 3-7118; W.S. 1957, § 1-913; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-32-115

.

§ 1-31-116.
Rights of persons adjudged entitled to office; action for damages
against person ousted; limitation on time of action.

The successful claimant
may at any time within one (1) year after the date of the judgment,
bring an action against the party ousted and recover the damages he
sustained by reason of the usurpation.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 762; R.S. 1887, § 3110; R.S. 1899, § 4231; C.S. 1910, § 5091; C.S. 1920, § 6353; R.S. 1931, § 89-4619; C.S. 1945, § 3-7119; W.S. 1957, § 1-914; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-32-116

.

§ 1-31-117.
Rights of persons adjudged entitled to office; person refusing to
deliver books or papers deemed guilty of contempt; penalty.

If the defendant refuses
or neglects to deliver any book or paper pursuant to demand, he is
guilty of contempt of court and shall be fined not exceeding ten thousand
dollars ($10,000.00), and imprisoned in the county jail until he complies
with the order of the court or is otherwise discharged by law.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 763; R.S. 1887, § 3111; R.S. 1899, § 4232; C.S. 1920, § 6354; R.S. 1931, § 89-4620; C.S. 1945, § 3-7120; W.S. 1957, § 1-915; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-32-117

.

§ 1-31-118.
Judgment against corporations; corporation to be ousted and dissolved.

When it is found that
a corporation has, by an act done or omitted, surrendered or forfeited
its corporate rights, privileges and franchises or has not used the
same for five (5) years, judgment shall be entered that it be ousted
and excluded therefrom, and that it be dissolved. When it is found
and adjudged that a corporation has offended in any matter or manner
which does not work a surrender or forfeiture, or has misused a franchise
or exercised a power not conferred by law, judgment shall be entered
that it be ousted from the continuance of the offense or exercise
of the power.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 764; R.S. 1887, § 3112; R.S. 1899, § 4233; C.S. 1910, § 5093; C.S. 1920, § 6355; R.S. 1931, § 89-4621; C.S. 1945, § 3-7121; W.S. 1957, § 1-916; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-32-118

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Corporation as necessary or proper party defendant in proceedings to determine validity of election or appointment of corporate director officer, 21 ALR2d 1048.

§ 1-31-119.
Judgment against corporations; appointment of trustees when corporation
dissolved; bond required; powers generally.

The court rendering a
judgment dissolving a corporation shall appoint trustees of the creditors
and stockholders of the corporation who, after giving a bond payable
to the state of Wyoming in a sum and with sureties as the court may
designate, conditioned that they will faithfully discharge their trust
and properly pay and apply all money that may come into their hands,
shall have power to settle the affairs of the corporation, collect
and pay outstanding debts and divide among the stockholders the money
and other property which remains after the payment of debts and necessary
expenses.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 765; R.S. 1887, § 3113; R.S. 1899, § 4234; C.S. 1910, § 5094; C.S. 1920, § 6356; R.S. 1931, § 89-4622; C.S. 1945, § 3-7122; W.S. 1957, § 1-917; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-32-119

.

§ 1-31-120.
Judgment against corporations; duties and powers of trustees.

The trustees shall promptly
demand all money, property, books, deeds, notes, bills, obligations
and papers of every description within the custody or control of the
officers of the corporation, which belong to the corporation or are
in any way necessary for the settlement of its affairs or for the
discharge of its debts and liabilities. They may sue for and recover
the demands and property of the corporation, and are jointly and severally
liable to the creditors and stockholders to the extent of its property
and effects which come into their hands.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 766; R.S. 1887, § 3114; R.S. 1899, § 4235; C.S. 1910, § 5095; C.S. 1920, § 6357; R.S. 1931, § 89-4623; C.S. 1945, § 3-7123; W.S. 1957, § 1-918; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-32-120

.

§ 1-31-121.
Judgment against corporations; penalty for failure to deliver items
to trustees; enforcement of delivery; liability to trustees.

An officer of a corporation
who refuses or neglects to deliver any money or other thing pursuant
to such demand is guilty of contempt of court and shall be fined not
exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) and imprisoned in the
county jail until he complies with the order of the court or is otherwise
discharged by law. He is liable to the trustees for the value of all
money or other things refused or neglected to be surrendered, together
with all damages that are sustained by the stockholders and creditors
of the corporation in consequence of the neglect or refusal.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 767; R.S. 1887, § 3115; R.S. 1899, § 4236; C.S. 1910, § 5096; C.S. 1920, § 6358; R.S. 1931, § 89-4624; C.S. 1945, § 3-7124; W.S. 1957, § 1-919; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-32-121

.

§ 1-31-122.
Judgment for costs.

If judgment is rendered
against a corporation or against a person claiming to be a corporation,
the court may render judgment for costs against the directors, trustees
or other officers of the corporation, or against the person claiming
to be a corporation.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 768; R.S. 1887, § 3116; R.S. 1899, § 4237; C.S. 1910, § 5097; C.S. 1920, § 6359; R.S. 1931, § 89-4625; C.S. 1945, § 3-7125; W.S. 1957, § 1-920; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-32-122

.

§ 1-31-123.
Order directing transfer of books and papers; enforcement by fine
or imprisonment.

In all actions under W.S.

1-31-101

through

1-31-130

, when the judgment is against the defendant, the court
may make an order directing the defendant promptly to deliver the
books, papers, property, money, deeds, notes, bills and obligations
to the persons entitled thereto or the trustees appointed to receive
them. If complaint is made upon affidavit to the district court of
a neglect or refusal to comply with the order, the court shall direct
an attachment returnable immediately to issue for the defendant, who
may be required to answer under oath touching the premises. If it
appears that the defendant neglects or refuses, the court shall render
judgment of fine or imprisonment, or both, as the court making the
order might have rendered.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 769; R.S. 1887, § 3117; R.S. 1899, § 4238; C.S. 1910, § 5098; C.S. 1920, § 6360; R.S. 1931, § 89-4626; C.S. 1945, § 3-7126; W.S. 1957, § 1-921; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-32-123.

Cross references. —

As to attachment of the person generally, see §§

1-15-201

to

1-15-212

.

§ 1-31-124.
Injunction in aid of proceedings against banking associations.

Any stockholder or stockholders,
owning not less than one-fourth (1/4) of the paid in capital stock of
any banking association, or entitled to the beneficial interest therein,
may have an injunction pending proceedings in quo warranto, restraining
the directors or trustees from making any disposition of the assets
of the corporation prejudicial to the interests of the stockholders
or inconsistent with their duties as directors or trustees.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 770; R.S. 1887, § 3118; R.S. 1899, § 4239; C.S. 1910, § 5099; C.S. 1920, § 6361; R.S. 1931, § 89-4627; C.S. 1945, § 3-7127; W.S. 1957, § 1-922; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-32-124.

Cross references. —

For provisions concerning injunctions, see chapter 28 of this title.

§ 1-31-125.
Injunction in aid of proceedings against banking associations; security
required of bank directors.

The court may, upon satisfactory
proof that the directors or trustees of a corporation have violated
or are about to violate any of the franchises thereof, require them
to give security to the stockholders satisfactory to the court for
the proper discharge of their duties, and for the proper management
and security of the assets. The court may enjoin the directors or
trustees from paying out or issuing the notes of circulation of the
bank and from incurring any additional liabilities, except for the
payment of the necessary services of the officers and employees of
the banking association, the amount of which while the proceedings
are pending shall be under the control of the court.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 771; R.S. 1887, § 3119; R.S. 1899, § 4240; C.S. 1910, § 5100; C.S. 1920, § 6362; R.S. 1931, § 89-4628; C.S. 1945, § 3-7128; W.S. 1957, § 1-923; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-32-125.

§ 1-31-126.
Injunction against aid of proceedings against banking associations;
directors may be enjoined from borrowing money.

The court may enjoin
the directors or trustees from borrowing or issuing, either directly
or indirectly, any of the money or assets of the bank for their individual
benefit while the proceedings are pending.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 772; R.S. 1887, § 3120; R.S. 1899, § 4241; C.S. 1910, § 5101; C.S. 1920, § 6363; R.S. 1931, § 89-4629; C.S. 1945, § 3-7129; W.S. 1957, § 1-924; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-32-126.

Cross references. —

For provisions concerning injunctions, see chapter 28 of this title.

§ 1-31-127.
Limitation upon time of bringing action against corporations or officer.

Nothing in W.S.

1-31-101

through

1-31-130

shall authorize an action against a corporation for forfeiture
of charter unless commenced within five (5) years after the act complained
of was committed. An action may not be brought against a corporation
for the exercise of a power or franchise under its charter which it
has exercised for a term of twenty (20) years, nor may an action be
brought against an officer to oust him from his office unless within
three (3) years after the cause of the ouster or the right to hold
the office arose.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 773; R.S. 1887, § 3121; R.S. 1899, § 4242; C.S. 1910, § 5102; C.S. 1920, § 6364; R.S. 1931, § 89-4630; C.S. 1945, § 3-7130; W.S. 1957, § 1-925; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-32-127.

§ 1-31-128.
Actions against officers of ousted corporations; limitation upon
time.

When judgment of forfeiture
and ouster is rendered against a corporation because of misconduct
of the officers, trustees or directors, a person injured thereby may
within one (1) year, in an action against the officers or directors,
recover damages sustained by reason of the misconduct.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 774; R.S. 1887, § 3122; R.S. 1899, § 4243; C.S. 1910, § 5103; C.S. 1920, § 6365; R.S. 1931, § 89-4631; C.S. 1945, § 3-7131; W.S. 1957, § 1-926; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-32-128.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Personal Liability for Directors of Nonprofit Corporations in Wyoming,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 273 (1983).

§ 1-31-129.
Provisions to be cumulative.

Nothing in W.S.

1-31-101

through

1-31-130

is intended to restrain any court from enforcing the
performance of trusts for charitable purposes at the relation of the
county attorney of the proper county, or from enforcing trusts or
restraining abuses in other corporations at the suit of a person injured.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 775; R.S. 1887, § 3123; R.S. 1899, § 4244; C.S. 1910, § 5104; C.S. 1920, § 6366; R.S. 1931, § 89-4632; C.S. 1945, § 3-7132; W.S. 1957, § 1-927; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-32-129; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Personal Liability for Directors of Nonprofit Corporations in Wyoming,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 273 (1983).

§ 1-31-130.
Precedence of actions; speedy trial.

Actions for quo warranto
shall have precedence in any court over any civil business pending
therein. If the matter is of public concern, on the motion of the
attorney general or prosecuting attorney, the court shall require
as speedy a trial of the merits of the case as may be consistent with
the rights of the parties.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 777; R.S. 1887, § 3125; R.S. 1899, § 4246; C.S. 1910, § 5106; C.S. 1920, § 6368; R.S. 1931, § 89-4634; C.S. 1945, § 3-7134; W.S. 1957, § 1-929; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-32-130.

Abandonment. —

Failure of incumbents to bring quo warranto until eight months after invalid appointments of new board members and after annual meeting did not show loss of offices by “abandonment” or by “acquiescence.” People ex rel. Warren v. Christian, 58 Wyo. 39, 123 P.2d 368,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1942).